Utah statutes.
58-17b-608.   Emergency refills.

(1)  In the interest of the patient's health, a pharmacist or pharmacy intern may, in an emergency, refill a prescription for a patient, but only if the prescribing practitioner is not available promptly to authorize the refill and only if in the professional judgment of the pharmacist or pharmacy intern the prescription should be refilled.

(2)  Only sufficient medication as necessary in the emergency may be furnished by the pharmacist or pharmacy intern, not to exceed a three-day supply.

(3)  The practitioner shall be contacted as soon as possible for further instructions concerning the emergency.



Enacted by Chapter 280, 2004 General Session

